test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-wunyi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - вунись: # Defective verb 'not to be' /Type 6/ - only Ind and Int exist (partial paradigm)
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: вунидмʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: вунин
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: вуни
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: вуниниʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: вунидиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: вунихиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: вуниваˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: вунидаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: вуниˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: вунидамзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: вунинась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: вунись
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: вунининзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: вунидинзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: вунихинзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: вуниваць
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: вунидаць
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: вуниць
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1: вуньсадмʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2: вуньсан
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3: вуньса
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1: вуньсани’
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2: вуньсади’
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3: вуньсаха’
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1: вуньсаваˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2: вуньсадаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3: вуньсаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: вунив
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: вунир
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: вунида
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: вунимиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: вунириʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: вунидиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: вуниваˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: вунираˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: вунидоʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: вунихиюн
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: вунихиюд
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: вунихиюда
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: вунихиюниʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: вунихиюдиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: вунихиюдиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: вунихиюнаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: вунихиюдаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: вунихиюдоʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: вунин
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: вунид
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: вунида
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: вуниниʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: вунидиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: вунидиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: вунинаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: вунидаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: вунидоʼ   
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: вунивась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: вунирась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: вунидась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: вуниминзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: вуниринзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: вунидинзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: вуниваць
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: вунираць
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: вунидонзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: вунихиюнась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: вунихиюдась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: вунихиюдась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: вунихиюнинзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: вунихиюдинзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: вунихиюдинзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: вунихиюнаць
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: вунихиюдаць
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: вунихиюдонзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: вунинась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: вунидась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: вунидась
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: вунининзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: вунидинзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: вунидинзь
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: вунинаць
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: вунидаць
     вунись+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: вунидонзь
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcSg3: вуньсав
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcSg3: вуньсар
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcSg3: вуньсада
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcSg3: вуньсамиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcSg3: вуньсариʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcSg3: вуньсадиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcSg3: вуньсаваˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcSg3: вуньсараˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcSg3: вуньсадоʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcDu3: вуньсахаюн
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcDu3: вуньсахаюд
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcDu3: вуньсахаюда
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcDu3: вуньсахаюниʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcDu3: вуньсахаюдиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcDu3: вуньсахаюдиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcDu3: вуньсахаюнаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcDu3: вуньсахаюдаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcDu3: вуньсахаюдоʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcPl3: вуньсян
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcPl3: вуньсяд
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcPl3: вуньсяда
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcPl3: вуньсяниʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcPl3: вуньсядиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcPl3: вуньсядиʼ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcPl3: вуньсянаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcPl3: вуньсядаˮ
     вунись+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcPl3: вуньсядоʼ       
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: вунивˮ
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: вунин
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: вуниˮ
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: вуниниʼ
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: вунидиʼ
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: вунихиʼ
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: вунинаˮ
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: вунидаˮ
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: вунидˮ
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg1: вуниваць
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg2: вунинась
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg3: вуниць
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu1: вунининзь
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu2: вунидинзь
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu3: вунихинзь
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl1: вунинаць
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl2: вунидаць
     вунись+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl3: вунидаць
     вунись+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg1: вуньсявˮ
     вунись+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg2: вуньсян
     вунись+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg3: вуньясьˮ
     вунись+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu1: вуньсяниʼ
     вунись+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu2: вуньсядиʼ
     вунись+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu3: вуньсяхаʼ
     вунись+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl1: вуньсянаˮ
     вунись+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl2: вуньсядаˮ
     вунись+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl3: вуньсядˮ

     
